Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-512.06
Perpetual care trust fund; withdrawal; when authorized; amount.

The initial perpetual care fund established for any cemetery shall remain an irrevocable trust fund until such time as this fund, together with accumulations and additions thereto from funds derived as provided in section 12-512.02, shall have reached twenty-five thousand dollars when it may be withdrawn at the rate of one thousand dollars from the original five thousand dollars for each additional two thousand dollars added to the fund, until all of the five thousand dollars has been withdrawn.

Laws 1955, c. 18, § 4, p. 92.